Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2004.07
Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund is created. The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety of the Nebraska State Patrol shall administer the fund. The fund shall be used to purchase motor vehicles for the Nebraska State Patrol. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1995, LB 381, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 201.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.